DIAGNOSTICS -

AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM

DI-121

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

If malfunction code is displayed during the DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code in the table below

(Proceed to the page given for that circuit.)
w/o Navigation system:

DI264-12

Blinking light Detection ltem Trouble Area Memory
RrDEF Normal - -
RIDEE Frontroomtemperature sensor circuit * Roomtemp. sensor
r
FACE*1 ¢ Harness or connector between roomtemp. sensorand A/C 0
DI-132 amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
(bi-182) « A/C amplifier
RIDEE Ambienttemperature sensor circuit * Ambienttemp. sensor
r
B/L* 2 ¢ Harness or connector between ambienttemp. sensorand 0
DI—135 A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
(DI-135) * A/C amplifier
RIDEE Frontevaporatortemperature sensor » Evaporatortemp. sensor
FOOT circuit *Harness or connector between evaporatortemp. sensorand O
DI-138 A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
(DI-138) * A/C amplifier
RIACSW Rear evaporatortemperature sensor * Rear evaporatortemp. sensor
r \ -
FOOT circuit * Harness or connector between Rear evaporatortemp. sen- O
DI-144 sor and A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
(Di-144) « A/C amplifier
RIACSW Rearroomtemperature sensor circuit * Rearroomtemp. sensor
r f
1 * Harness or connector between rearroomtemp. sensorand 0
FACE* i i
DI_147 A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
(O1=147) « A/C amplifier
RIDEF Engine coolanttemperature sensor cir- * Engine coolanttemp. sensor
D cuit * Harness or connector between engine coolanttemp. sensor
Dl-141 and A/C amplifier -
(Di-141) * A/C amplifier
Solar sensor circuit (Open) « Solarsensor _
RDER, * Harrtress or connector etweersolarsensorand-  A/C ampiif
DEF* Solar sensor circuit (Short) or 0
(DI-150) « A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
Openin pressure sensor circuit ¢ Pressure switch
RrDEF Abnormalrefrigerant pressurg * Harness or connector between pressure switchand A/C
FRS [below 196 kPa (2.0 kgf/cm o 28 psi) amplifier -
(DI-156) over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/cm ,455psi)]| <Refrigerantpipeline
* A/C amplifier
Rearlinletairtemperature sensor circuit * Rearinletairtemp. sensor
RrACSW, HI * Harness or connector betweenrearinletairtemp. sensor 0
(DI-160) and A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
» A/C amplifier
RIDEE Frontair mixdamper position sensor * Airmix damper position sensor
r
REC circuit * A/C amplifier 0
* Harness or connector between air mix damper position sen- (1 min.ormore)
(DI-163) o
sor and A/C amplifier
RIDEF airinletdamper position sensor circuit * Airinletdamper position sensor circuit
r
Lo » A/C amplifier 0
* Harness or connector between airinlet damper position (1 min.ormore)
(DI-167) "
sensor and A/C amplifier
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Frontair mix damper position sensor  Air mix damper control servomotor
RIDEF circuit * Air mix damper position sensor
M1 « Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and air mix _
osition sensor
(DI-163 P . o (15secs. ormore)
DI-174) ¢ Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and air mix
damper control servomotor
» A/C amplifier
Airinletdamper position sensor circuit * Air mix damper control servomotor
RIDEFE * Airmix damper position sensor
M2 ¢ Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and air mix
osition sensor -
(DI-167 P i . (15secs. ormore)
DI-177) * Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and mix
damper control servomotor
* A/C amplifier
HINT:

« " Iftheroomtemp.isapprox.  -20°C (-4°F) orlower, RrDEF and FACE indicator may be light up even
though the system is normal.

« "2|ftheambienttemperatureisapprox. = -50°C (-58°F) orlower,a DTC may be outputeventhough
the system is normal.

« * Ifthecheckisbeing performedinadark place, RrDEF and DEF (solar sensor circuitabnormal) could
be light up. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light,
on the solar sensor. If RrDEF and DEF is still light up, there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.
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DIAGNOSTICS -

AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM

DI-123

w/ Navigation system:

DTC No. )
Detection Item Trouble Area Memory
(See page)
00 Normal - -
; Frontroomtemperature sensor circuit e Frontroomtemp. sensor
11 * * Harness or connector between frontroomtemp. sensorand 0
(DI-132) A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Ambienttemperature sensor circuit * Ambienttemp. sensor
12*2 ¢ Harness or connector between ambienttemp. sensorand 0
(DI-135) A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
* A/C amplifier
Frontevaporatortemperature sensor * Frontevaporatortemp. sensor
13 circuit * Harness or connector between frontevaporator temp. sen- 0
(DI-138) sor and A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
» A/C amplifier
Engine coolanttemperature sensor cir- * Engine coolanttemp. sensor
14 cuit * Harness or connector between engine coolanttemp. sensor
(DI-141) and A/C amplifier N
» A/C amplifier
Solar sensor circuit (Open) * Solarsensor _
29 3 — » Harhess or connectorbetweensolarsensorand-  A/C amplif
(DI-150) Solar sensor circuit (Short) er 0
* A/C amplifier (8.5 min. or more)
Allconditions below are detected for3 » Compressordrive belt
4 sec. or more » Compressor lock sensor
22* (a) Engine speed: 450 rpm or more * Compressor
(DI-153) (b) Ratio between engine and compres- ¢ Harness and connector between A/C amplifierand compres- -
sorrpmdeviates 20% or more in com- sor, compressorlock sensor
parison to normal operation. » A/C amplifier
Openin pressure sensor circuit ¢ Pressure switch
23 Abnormal refrigerant pressure * Harness or connector between pressure switchand A/C
(DI-156) [below 196 kPa (2.0 kgf/cm o 28psi) amplifier -
over3, 140kPa(32.0kgf/lcm ,455psi)]| ¢Refrigerantpipeline
* A/C amplifier
Frontair mixdamper position sensor * Frontair mix damper position sensor
31 circuit * A/C amplifier 0
(DI-163) * Harness or connector between front air mix damper position (1 min.ormore)
sensor and A/C amplifier
Airinletdamper position sensor circuit * Airinlet damper position sensor circuit
32 * A/C amplifier 0
(DI-163) * Harness or connector between airinlet damper position (1 min. ormore)
sensor and A/C amplifier
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DIAGNOSTICS - AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEM

41
(DI-163
DI-174)

Front air mix damper position sensor
circuit

* Front air mix damper control servomotor

« Front air mix damper position sensor

eHarness and connector between A/C amplifier front and air
mix position sensor

*Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and front air
mix damper control servomotor

* A/C amplifier

(15 secs. or more)

42
(DI-167
DI-177)

Air inlet damper position sensor circuit

* Air mix damper control servomotor

* Air mix damper position sensor

*Harness and connector between A/C amplifier and air mix
position sensor

eHarness and connector between A/C amplifier and mix
damper control servomotor

* A/C amplifier

(15 secs. or more)

HINT:

« ™ Ifthe room temp. is approx. —20° C (-4°F) or lower, DTC 11 may be light up even though the system
is normal.
« 2| the ambient temperature is approx. -50° C (-58°F) or lower, a DTC may be output even though
tge system is normal.
e * Ifthe check is being performed in a dark place, DTC 11 (solar sensor circuit abnormal) could be dis-
played. In this case, perform DTC check again while shining a light, such as an inspection light, on the
s?lar sensor. If DTC 11 is still displayed, there could be trouble in the solar sensor circuit.
« * Compressor lock (DTC 22) is indicated only for a current malfunction. (See page DI-153)
To confirm DTC 22, preform the following steps.
(1) Withthe engine ON, enterthe DTC check mode.

)
3)
(4)
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Press the R/F switch to enter actuator check mode, and set the operation to Step No. 3.
Press the AUTO switch to return to DTC check mode.
The DTC is displayed after approx. 3 secs.




